Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2030.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 49-1332, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-1332. Water conservation grant fund; purposes A. Monies in the water conservation grant fund must facilitate voluntary water conservation programs or projects that are expected to result in at least one of the following: 1. Long-term reductions in water use. 2. Improvements in water use efficiency. 3. Improvements in water reliability. B. Monies in the water conservation grant fund may be used for the following: 1. Education and research programs on how to reduce water consumption, increase water efficiency or increase water reuse. 2. 1. Programs and projects for rainwater harvesting, gray water systems, efficiency upgrades, installing drought-resistant landscaping, turf removal and other practices to reduce water use. 3. 2. Programs or projects to promote groundwater recharge and improved aquifer health. 4. 3. Programs or projects to improve groundwater conservation and surface water flows. 5. 4. Landscape watershed protection, restoration and rehabilitation, including through green infrastructure and low-impact development to conserve or augment water supplies. 6. 5. Projects facilitating coordinated water management, including groundwater storage and recovery. 7. 6. Programs or projects to reduce structural water overuse issues. 8. 7. Program implementation and administration costs for eligible programs. 8. Education programs that inform residents how to reduce water consumption, increase water efficiency or increase water reuse. The authority shall prioritize On-the-ground projects over education programs. END_STATUTE